District of Columbia statutes.
1-325.121

Establishment of Community-Based Violence Reduction Fund.

(a)

(1)

There is established as a nonlapsing fund the Community-based Violence Reduction Fund (“Fund”).

(2)

All funds deposited into the Fund, and any interest earned on those funds, shall not revert to the unrestricted fund balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia at the end of a fiscal year or at any other time, but shall be continually available for the uses and purposes set forth in subsection (b) of this section without regard to fiscal year limitation, subject to authorization by Congress.

(b)

The funds in the Fund shall be used only for the purpose of giving grants to community-based organizations in accordance with criteria to be established, and uniformly applied, by the Justice Grants Administration.

(c)

Not more than 5% of the total amount of monies in the Community-Based Violence Reduction Fund in any given fiscal year may be used to pay administrative costs necessary to implement the requirements of this section.

Aug. 16, 2008, D.C. Law 17-219, § 3014, 55 DCR 7598
Short title: Section 3013 of D.C. Law 17-219 provided that subtitle F of title III of the act may be cited as the “Community-based Violence Reduction Fund”.